srcV2/esu.stress.twol
! LANGUAGE: "esu"
! AUTHOR: "Lonny Alaskuk Strunk"

! This Central Alaskan Yup'ik FST morphological analyzer/generator and the 
! associated source code is available under the GNU Affero General Public 
! License (GNU AGPL v.3):
!
! Copyright (C) 2020 Lonny Alaskuk Strunk
!
! This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it under 
! the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by the Free 
! Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or (at your option) any 
! later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but WITHOUT 
! ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS 
! FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU Affero General Public License for more 
! details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License along 
! with this program. If not, see https://www.gnu.org/licenses/.


Alphabet
    a c e g i k l m n p q r s t u v w y m̄ n̄
    vv ll ss gg rr ng n͞g u͡g u͡gg u͡r u͡rr '
    %[e%]
    ạ ụ ġ                                       ! for (ar) droppping
    á í ú ạ́ ụ́ â î û ậ ụ̂ é ê
    %[é%] %[ê%]                                 ! weak initial e cannot be hatted
    A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Vv Ll Ss Gg Rr Ng N͞g U͡g U͡gg U͡r U͡rr M̄ N̄ ! pass through for [NonYupik]
    1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 30 31 32 33 34 35 36 37 38 39 ! pass through for [NonYupik]
    %< %> %$ %& %↞ %↠
    %= ;


Sets 
    B = %< %> %& %↞ %↠ %$ ;

    Stop = p t c k q ;
    VoiceFric = v l s g r u͡g u͡r ġ ; 
    VlessFric = vv ll ss gg rr u͡gg u͡rr ;
    VoiceNasal = m n ng ;
    VlessNasal = m̄ n̄ n͞g ;

    VoiceCon = VoiceFric VoiceNasal ;
    VlessCon = VlessFric VlessNasal Stop ;

    Fric = VoiceFric VlessFric ;
    Nasal = VoiceNasal VlessNasal ;

    Con = Stop Fric Nasal w y ;

    FVow = a i u ạ ụ ;
    FVowStress = á í ú ạ́ ụ́ ;
    FVowHatted = â î û ậ ụ̂ ;
    AllFVow = FVow FVowStress FVowHatted ;
    Vow = FVow e %[e%] ;
    VowStress = FVowStress é %[é%] ;
    VowHatted = FVowHatted ê %[ê%] ; ! weak initial e cannot be hatted
    AllVow = Vow VowStress VowHatted ;

Rules 
! From pg 55 in practical grammar book (Jacobson, 1995)

"a:â"
Vx:Vy <=> [.#.|:Con] B:* :Vow B:* :Con B:* _ ~[ B:* :Vow :* | B:* :Con B:* :Con :* | B:* :Con B:* :' :* ] .#. ; ! CVCV̂~[V|CC|C'] ! Rule 1
    except
        _ B:* (:Vow) B:* (:Con) B:* [.#.|:%=] ; ! final syllable
    where Vx in Vow
          Vy in VowHatted
    matched;

"a:á"
Vx:Vy <=> :Vow B:* _ ; ! VV́(C)                                                                                 ! Rule 2
          [.#.|:Con] B:* _ B:* :Con B:* ([:Con|:']) B:* :Vow B:* :AllVow ; ! CV́C(C)VV́                          ! Rule 3
          .#. (:Con) B:* _ B:* :Con B:* [:Con|:'] ; ! #(C)V́C[C']                                               ! Rule 4
          [.#.|:Con|:'] B:* :Vow B:* (:Con) B:* :Con B:* _ B:* :Con B:* :Con ; ! every 2nd closed syllable     ! Rule 5a 
          :Con B:* _ B:* :Con B:* :Con B:* :Vow B:* :Con B:* :AllVow ; ! 1st syllable if second syllable open  ! Rule 5b
    except
        _ B:* (:Con) B:* [.#.|%-] ; ! final syllable
        [.#.|:Con] B:* :Vow B:* :Con B:* _ ~[ B:* :Vow :* | B:* :Con B:* :Con :* | B:* :Con B:* :' :* ] .#. ; ! CVCV̂~[V|CC|C']  ! Rule 1  
    where Vx in Vow
          Vy in VowStress
    matched;
